Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5848
Application; decision; findings and conclusions.

The department shall, when it approves or rejects an application, provide in writing to the applicant the decision and the findings and conclusions on which it based the decision.

Laws 1979, LB 172, § 48;

Laws 1982, LB 378, § 39;

Laws 1989, LB 429, § 28;

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 30.